Hawaii statutes.
§572-10 Applicant apparently under age.
If any applicant for a license to marry appears to any agent to be under the
age of eighteen years, the agent shall, before granting a license to marry,
require the production of a certificate of birth or other satisfactory proof
showing the age of the applicant. [L 1931, c 65, §3; RL 1935, §4638; RL 1945,
§12359; RL 1955, §323-10; HRS §572-10; am L 1979, c 105, §56]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next